Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.130

Correction by judges.

Within thirty days after such proof sheets are furnished, the judges must return the same to the reporter, with corrections or alterations, and he or she must make the corrections or alterations accordingly.

[ 2011 c 336 s 48; 1890 p 320 s 4; RRS s 11061.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR 17.